Washington statutes.
RCW 36.83.140

Local service district fund.

If a service district is formed, there shall be created in the office of the county treasurer, as ex officio treasurer of the service district, a local service district fund with such accounts as the treasurer may find convenient or as the state auditor or the governing body of the service district may direct, into which shall be deposited all revenues received by or on behalf of the service district from tax levies, gifts, donations and any other source. The fund shall be designated "(name of county) (road/bridge) service district No. . . . fund."

[ 1996 c 292 s 7.]